Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-146] Drunk on duty; sleeping on
post; leaving post before relief. Any person subject to this chapter who
is found drunk on duty or sleeping upon the person's post, or who leaves the
person's post before the person is regularly relieved, shall be punished as a
court-martial may direct. [L 1982, c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next